North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-10 Corrupt Practices

16.1-10-01.
Corrupt practice — What constitutes.

A person is guilty of corrupt practice within the meaning of this chapter if the person willfully engages in any of the following:

Expends any money for election purposes contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

Engages in any of the practices prohibited by section 12.1-14-02 or 12.1-14-03.

Is guilty of the use of state services or property or the services or property of a political subdivision of the state for political purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 2001, ch. 203, § 3.

Cross-References.

Defrauding or obstructing elector, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-01-12.

Interference with election, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-14-02.

16.1-10-02.
Use of state or political subdivision services or property for political purposes.

No person may use any property belonging to or leased by, or any service which is provided to or carried on by, either directly or by contract, the state or any agency, department, bureau, board, commission, or political subdivision thereof, for any political purpose.

The following definitions must be used for the purposes of this section:

“Political purpose” means any activity undertaken in support of or in opposition to a statewide initiated or referred measure, a constitutional amendment or measure, a political subdivision ballot measure, or the election or nomination of a candidate to public office and includes using “vote for”, “oppose”, or any similar support or opposition language in any advertisement whether the activity is undertaken by a candidate, a political committee, a political party, or any person. In the period thirty days before a primary election and sixty days before a special or general election, “political purpose” also means any activity in which a candidate’s name, office, district, or any term meaning the same as “incumbent” or “challenger” is used in support of or in opposition to the election or nomination of a candidate to public office. The term does not include activities undertaken in the performance of public office or a position taken in any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial. Factual information may be presented regarding a ballot question solely for the purpose of educating voters if the information does not advocate for or against or otherwise reflect a position on the adoption or rejection of the ballot question.

“Property” includes motor vehicles, telephones, typewriters, adding machines, postage or postage meters, funds of money, and buildings. However, nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit any candidate, political party, committee, or organization from using any public building for such political meetings as may be required by law, or to prohibit such candidate, party, committee, or organization from hiring the use of any public building for any political purpose if such lease or hiring is otherwise permitted by law.

“Services” includes the use of employees during regular working hours for which such employees have not taken annual or sick leave or other compensatory leave.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 1997, ch. 194, § 9; 2001, ch. 203, § 4; 2007, ch. 193, § 3; 2011, ch. 157, § 1.

16.1-10-03.
Political badge, button, or insignia at elections.

No individual may buy, sell, give, or provide any political badge, button, or any insignia within a polling place or within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from the entrance to the room containing the polling place while it is open for voting. No such political badge, button, or insignia may be worn within that same area while a polling place is open for voting.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 2011, ch. 152, § 20.

16.1-10-04.
Publication of false information in political advertisements — Penalty.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if that person knowingly, or with reckless disregard for its truth or falsity, publishes any political advertisement or news release that contains any assertion, representation, or statement of fact, including information concerning a candidate’s prior public record, which is untrue, deceptive, or misleading, whether on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate for public office, initiated measure, referred measure, constitutional amendment, or any other issue, question, or proposal on an election ballot, and whether the publication is by radio, television, newspaper, pamphlet, folder, display cards, signs, posters, billboard advertisements, websites, electronic transmission, or by any other public means. This section does not apply to a newspaper, television or radio station, or other commercial medium that is not the source of the political advertisement or news release.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 1989, ch. 255, § 1; 1989, ch. 256, § 1; 2007, ch. 195, § 1; 2007, ch. 196, § 1.

16.1-10-04.1.
Certain political advertisements to disclose name of sponsor — Name disclosure requirements.

Every political advertisement by newspaper, pamphlet or folder, display card, sign, poster, or billboard, website, or by any other similar public means, on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate for public office, designed to assist, injure, or defeat the candidate by reflecting upon the candidate’s personal character or political action, or by a measure committee as described in section 16.1-08.1-01, or a corporation making an independent expenditure either for or against a measure, must disclose on the advertisement the name of the person, as defined in section 16.1-08.1-01, or political party paying for the advertisement. If the name of a political party, association, or partnership is used, the disclaimer must also include the name of the chairman or other responsible individual from the political party, association, or partnership. The name of the person paying for any radio or television broadcast containing any advertising announcement for or against any candidate for public office must be announced at the close of the broadcast. If the name of a political party, association, or partnership is used, the disclaimer must also include the name of the chairman or other responsible individual from the political party, association, or partnership. In every political advertisement in which the name of the person paying for the advertisement is disclosed, the first and last name of any named individual must be disclosed. An advertisement paid for by an individual candidate or group of candidates must disclose that the advertisement was paid for by the individual candidate or group of candidates. The first and last name or names of the candidates paying for the advertisement are not required to be disclosed. This section does not apply to campaign buttons.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 803, § 1; 1989, ch. 257, § 1; 2001, ch. 203, § 5; 2009, ch. 180, § 19; 2015, ch. 159, § 10, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

16.1-10-05.
Paying owner, editor, publisher, or agent of newspaper to advocate or oppose candidate editorially prohibited.

No person may pay or give anything of value to the owner, editor, publisher, or agent of any newspaper or other periodical, or radio or television station, to induce the person to advocate editorially or to oppose any candidate for nomination or election, and no such owner, editor, publisher, or agent may accept such inducement.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7.

Cross-References.

Bribery of elector, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-14-03.

16.1-10-06.
Electioneering within boundary of an open polling place.

An individual may not ask, solicit, or in any manner try to induce or persuade, any voter within a polling place or within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from the entrance to the room containing a polling place while it is open for voting to vote or refrain from voting for any candidate or the candidates or ticket of any political party or organization, or any measure submitted to the people. The display upon motor vehicles of adhesive signs which are not readily removable and which promote the candidacy of any individual, any political party, or a vote upon any measure, and political advertisements promoting the candidacy of any individual, political party, or a vote upon any measure which are displayed on fixed permanent billboards, may not, however, be deemed a violation of this section.

A vehicle or movable sign of any type containing a political message as described in subsection 1 may be allowed to remain within the restricted area only for the period of time necessary for the owner or operator of the vehicle or sign to complete the act of voting.

Except as provided in subsection 1, a sign placed on private property which displays a political message may not be restricted by a political subdivision, including a home rule city or county, unless the political subdivision demonstrates a burden to the public safety.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 2013, ch. 173, § 2; 2017, ch. 154, § 11, effective August 1, 2017.

16.1-10-06.1.
Paying for certain election-related activities prohibited.

No person may pay any individual for:

Any loss or damage due to attendance at the polls;

Registering;

The expense of transportation to or from the polls; or

Personal services to be performed on the day of a caucus, primary election, or any election which tend in any way, directly or indirectly, to affect the result of such caucus or election.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 129, § 14; C.L. 1913, § 936; R.C. 1943, § 16-2015; N.D.C.C. § 16-20-15; 2015, ch. 162, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 162, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

16.1-10-06.2.
Sale or distribution at polling place.

A person may not approach a person attempting to enter a polling place, or who is in a polling place, for the purpose of selling, soliciting for sale, advertising for sale, or distributing any merchandise, product, literature, or service. A person may not approach a person attempting to enter a polling place, who is in a polling place, or who is leaving a polling place for the purpose of gathering signatures for any reason. These prohibitions apply in any polling place or within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from any entrance leading into a polling place while it is open for voting.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 251, § 1; 2007, ch. 196, § 2; 2013, ch. 173, § 3.

16.1-10-07.
Candidate guilty of corrupt practice to vacate nomination of office.

If any individual is found guilty of any corrupt practice, the individual must be punished by being deprived of the individual’s government job, or the individual’s nomination or election must be declared void, as the case may be. This section does not remove from office an individual who is already in office and who has entered upon the discharge of the individual’s duties when the office is subject to the impeachment provisions of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7; 2021, ch. 164, § 47, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-10-08.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter, for which another penalty is not specifically provided, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 7.

Cross-References.

Election offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-01-12.